Illinois, session 104th, SB363.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Access to Justice Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 95/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Access to Justice Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-351, eff. 8-15-13.)